Utah statutes.
73-2-7.   Aid to federal court.

The state engineer, when requested by the district court of the United States for the district of Utah, may assist said court in any matter relating to the distribution and use of any of the waters of the state, and may when so requested cooperate with any water commissioner appointed by said court in any such matter.



No Change Since 1953

